bulgarian.affix
flag *Y:
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСАТ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕЙКИ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕЛИ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕЛИТЕ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕМ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕН
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕНА
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕНАТА
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕНИ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕНИТЕ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕНИЯ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕНИЯТ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕНО
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕНОТО
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕТЕ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕШ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЕШЕ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСИ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЛА
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЛАТА
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЛИ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЛИТЕ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЛИЯ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЛИЯТ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЛО
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЛОТО
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСОХ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСОХА
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСОХМЕ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСОХТЕ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЪЛ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯЛ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯЛА
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯЛАТА
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯЛИЯ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯЛИЯТ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯЛО
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯЛОТО
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯХ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯХА
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯХМЕ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯХТЕ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯЩ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯЩА
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯЩАТА
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯЩИ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯЩИТЕ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯЩИЯ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯЩИЯТ
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯЩО
    А С А    >      -АСА,АСЯЩОТО
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСАТ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕЙКИ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕЛИ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕЛИТЕ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕМ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕН
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕНА
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕНАТА
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕНИ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕНИТЕ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕНИЯ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕНИЯТ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕНО
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕНОТО
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕТЕ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕШ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЕШЕ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСИ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЛА
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЛАТА
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЛИ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЛИТЕ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЛИЯ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЛИЯТ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЛО
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЛОТО
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСОХ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСОХА
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСОХМЕ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСОХТЕ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЪЛ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯЛ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯЛА
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯЛАТА
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯЛИЯ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯЛИЯТ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯЛО
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯЛОТО
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯХ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯХА
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯХМЕ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯХТЕ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯЩ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯЩА
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯЩАТА
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯЩИ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯЩИТЕ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯЩИЯ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯЩИЯТ
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯЩО
    Е С А    >      -ЕСА,ЕСЯЩОТО
    К А      >      -КА,КАТ
    К А      >      -КА,КЛА
    К А      >      -КА,КЛАТА
    К А      >      -КА,КЛИ
    К А      >      -КА,КЛИТЕ
    К А      >      -КА,КЛИЯ
    К А      >      -КА,КЛИЯТ
    К А      >      -КА,КЛО
    К А      >      -КА,КЛОТО
    К А      >      -КА,КОХ
    К А      >      -КА,КОХА
    К А      >      -КА,КОХМЕ
    К А      >      -КА,КОХТЕ
    К А      >      -КА,КЪЛ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧАЩ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧАЩА
    К А      >      -КА,ЧАЩАТА
    К А      >      -КА,ЧАЩИ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧАЩИТЕ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧАЩИЯ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧАЩИЯТ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧАЩО
    К А      >      -КА,ЧАЩОТО
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕЙКИ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕЛ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕЛА
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕЛАТА
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕЛИ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕЛИТЕ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕЛИЯ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕЛИЯТ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕЛО
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕЛОТО
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕМ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕН
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕНА
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕНАТА
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕНИ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕНИТЕ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕНИЯ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕНИЯТ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕНО
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕНОТО
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕТЕ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕХ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕХА
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕХМЕ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕХТЕ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕШ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧЕШЕ
    К А      >      -КА,ЧИ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,КА
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,КАЛ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,КАЛА
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,КАЛАТА
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,КАЛИ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,КАЛИТЕ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,КАЛИЯ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,КАЛИЯТ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,КАЛО
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,КАЛОТО
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,КАХ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,КАХА
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,КАХМЕ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,КАХТЕ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧАТ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЙКИ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЛ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЛА
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЛАТА
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЛИ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЛИТЕ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЛИЯ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЛИЯТ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЛО
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЛОТО
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕМ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕТЕ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕХ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕХА
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕХМЕ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕХТЕ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕШ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕШЕ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЩ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЩА
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЩАТА
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЩИ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЩИТЕ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЩИЯ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЩИЯТ
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЩО
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧЕЩОТО
    Ч А      >      -ЧА,ЧИ
